Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-706
Right-of-way; condemnation; location; costs; abandonment.

Any right-of-way obtained under sections 86-701 to 86-707 by condemnation proceedings for poles, aerial wires, and aerial cables shall be located only on section boundary lines as established by law or property boundary lines adjoining public highways as established by law. All expense of surveying, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees shall be paid by the telecommunications company obtaining the right-of-way. If any telecommunications line constructed under sections 86-701 to 86-707 is abandoned for three years, the right-of-way or easement shall revert to the property affected.

Laws 1931, c. 158, § 1, p. 419;

Laws 1941, c. 193, § 1, p. 762;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 86-301;

Laws 1943, c. 231, § 1, p. 778;

R.S.1943, § 86-303;

Laws 1999, LB 496, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-303;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 411.